Maine, session 132, LD2199.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1730-B is enacted to read:
§1730-B. Interference with professional judgment or clinical decision of licensed
health care professional prohibited
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Health care entity" means a health care provider, a health care facility or a provider
organization. "Health care entity" does not include a nursing facility as defined in
section 328, subsection 18.
B. "Health care facility" means a licensed institution providing health care services or
a health care setting, including, but not limited to, hospitals and other licensed inpatient
facilities; health systems consisting of one or more health care entities that are jointly
owned or managed; ambulatory surgical or treatment centers; residential treatment
centers; diagnostic, laboratory and imaging centers; freestanding emergency facilities;
outpatient clinics; and rehabilitation and other therapeutic health settings.
C. "Health care provider" means a person, corporation, partnership, governmental unit,
state institution, medical practice or other entity qualified or licensed under state law
to perform or provide health care services to persons in the State.
D. "Provider organization" means any corporation, partnership, business trust,
association or organized group of persons that is in the business of health care delivery
or management, whether incorporated or not, that represents one or more health care
providers in contracting with carriers for the payment of health care services. "Provider
organization" includes, but is not limited to, physician organizations, physician-
hospital organizations, independent practice associations, health care provider
networks, accountable care organizations and management services organizations and
any other organization that contracts with carriers for payment for health care services.
2. Interference with professional judgment or clinical decision of licensed health
care professional prohibited. A person may not directly or indirectly interfere with,
control or otherwise direct the professional judgment or clinical decision of a licensed
health care professional with independent practice authority who provides health care
services at or through a health care entity. Conduct prohibited under this subsection
includes, but is not limited to, controlling, either directly or indirectly, through discipline,
punishment, threats, adverse employment actions, coercion, retaliation or excessive
pressure, any of the following:
A. The amount of time spent with a patient or the number of patients seen in a given
time period, including, but not limited to, the time permitted to triage patients in the
emergency department or evaluate admitted patients;
B. The time period within which a patient must be discharged;
C. Decisions involving a patient's clinical status, including, but not limited to, whether
a patient should be kept in observation status, whether a patient should receive
palliative care and where a patient should be placed upon discharge;
Page 1 - 132LR3025(01)

D. The diagnosis, diagnostic terminology or billing codes that are entered into a
patient's medical record;
E. Decisions involving the appropriate diagnostic test for medical conditions; or
F. The exercise of professional judgment or other clinical decision making by a
licensed health care professional with independent practice authority that the
department determines is intended to interfere with, control or direct that licensed
health care professional's professional judgment or clinical decisions.